California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) The Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with the California Health and Human Services Agency and the State Department of Health Care Services, shall make its determination of the 988 surcharge amount each year no later than October 1 and shall notify the department of the new amount, which shall be effective with respect to access lines and the purchase of prepaid mobile telephone services on or after January 1 of the next succeeding calendar year. The Office of Emergency Services shall provide written notice to the California Health and Human Services Agency and the State Department of Health Care Services of the new surcharge amount at least 30 days prior to October 1 each year, or as soon thereafter as is possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 13.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41032.

Immediately upon notification by the Office of Emergency Services, the department shall notify every service supplier and seller registered with it of the new amounts by a means determined by the department that may include, but is not limited to, mail, electronic mail, or internet website postings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 19.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration [41040. - 41041.]

41040.

Every service supplier or seller in this state shall register with the department upon a form prescribed by the department and shall set forth the name under which it transacts or intends to transact business and other information as the department may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 61.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41041.

(a) When necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the department may require any person subject to this part to place with it the security that the department determines. Security in the form of cash, insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, or a bond or bonds duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, payable to the state, conditioned upon faithful performance of all of the requirements of this part and expressly providing for the payment of all surcharges, penalties, and other obligations of the person arising out of this part, shall be held in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section. The amount of security shall be fixed by the department, not to exceed
 twice the estimated average quarterly liability of persons filing for quarterly periods, or three times the estimated average monthly liability of persons filing for monthly periods, determined in the manner that the department deems proper. Security held by the department shall be released after a three-year period in which the person has filed all returns and paid all surcharges due to the state under this part or any amount of surcharge required to be collected and paid to the state within the time required.

(b) If, when a person discontinues business, the
 department holds security pursuant to this section in the form of cash or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, the security when applied to the account of the taxpayer shall be deemed a payment on any liability of the person to the department on the date the business is discontinued.

(c) This section shall not apply to a taxpayer who either has timely filed all returns and paid all surcharges due to the state under this part for the three consecutive years prior to the effective date of this section, or has, on or before July 31, 1998, timely filed all returns and paid all
 surcharges due to the state under this part since the taxpayer registered with the department pursuant to Section 41040. However, the department may require security from any taxpayer who fails to remain in compliance with the reporting and payment requirements of this part subsequent to the effective date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 62.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Special Provisions and Exemptions [41045. - 41049.]

41045.

The surcharges imposed by this part, other than the surcharge imposed pursuant to Section 41028, shall be collected insofar as practicable at the same time as, and along with, the charges made in accordance with regular billing practice of the service supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 63.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41046.

(a) There are exempt from the surcharges the following access lines and nonaccess line services:

(1) Those lines supplying lifeline service.

(2) Those lines connected to public telephones.

(3) Those lines for which no charges are billed by a service supplier to a service user.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 20.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41049.

If an exemption is claimed by reason of the provisions of this part, and the service supplier or seller questions the validity of the claimed exemption, either the service supplier, seller, or the service user may request the department to issue a ruling as to the validity of the claimed exemption, accompanying the request with a statement showing the facts and basis for the claim. The department shall issue its ruling within 30 days of receipt of the request. Pending issuance of the ruling, the service supplier or seller shall not be obligated to collect the surcharge from the claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 64.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Determination of Surcharge [41050. - 41099.]



  ARTICLE 1. Due and Payable Dates [41050. - 41056.]

41050.

(a) The surcharges imposed by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 41020 are imposed to each access line for which a service user has subscribed in any calendar month, whether or not the subscription covered all or part of any month.

(b) If a service user subscribes for service with one service supplier for a portion of a month and then subscribes for service with another service supplier for the remainder of the same month, the service user is liable for the surcharge to each of the access lines for which the service user has subscribed with the service supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 21.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41051.

The surcharges imposed by this part and the amounts thereof required to be collected are due monthly, and the amount of surcharge collected in one calendar month by the service supplier shall be remitted to the department on or before the last day of the second month following the month in which the surcharges were collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 66.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41052.

(a) On or before the last day of the second month following each month in which the surcharges were collected, a return for that month shall be filed by a service supplier with the department using electronic media. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(b) The service supplier shall include a list of any service users who have refused to pay a cumulative total of three dollars ($3) or more of the surcharges imposed by this part with each return filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 22.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41052.1.

The department may require the payment of the amount due and the filing of returns for periods other than the periods set forth under this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 69.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41053.

The person required to file the return shall deliver the return together with a remittance of the amount of the surcharges payable to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 23.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41053.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 41053 and 41055, the surcharge imposed pursuant to Section 41028 and collected by a seller, except a service supplier, is due and payable to the department quarterly on or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter.

(b) On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, a return for the preceding calendar quarter shall be filed using electronic media with the department. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 70.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41054.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department, for good cause, may extend not to exceed one month the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the
 department within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the department, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any surcharge required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the department within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 71.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41054.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any surcharge required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the
 duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 57.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41055.

All amounts required to be paid to the state under this part shall be paid to the department in the form of remittances payable to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 72.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41056.

The service supplier and seller shall maintain records as may be necessary to determine the amount of surcharges collected under provisions of this part. Those records shall be maintained for a period of four years from the time the surcharge is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 24.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [41060. - 41063.]

41060.

(a) Any service supplier whose estimated surcharge liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the department pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the department, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the department.

(b) Any
 service supplier whose estimated surcharge liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the department.

(c) Any service supplier remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 41050). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is
 initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting surcharges by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the department. Any person who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the surcharges with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit surcharges pursuant to this article who remits those surcharges by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10
 percent of the surcharges incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any surcharge to the state or any amount of surcharge required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the department under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 41080), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the surcharge or amount of surcharge, in addition to the surcharge or amount of surcharge, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the surcharge or the amount of surcharge required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a
 service supplier’s estimated surcharge liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the department may consider returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the department’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the surcharges due for any one return. Any person remitting surcharges by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 41095.

(i) The department shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 74.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41061.

If the department finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with department procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 41060. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which that person bases the claim for relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 75.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41062.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or
 receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of the surcharge. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person through their own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank
 account and debiting
 the person’s own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits their own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 41060 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the
 department. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 76.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41063.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the department may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the department shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the department.

(c) Electronic media includes, but
 is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 77.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deficiency Determinations [41070. - 41078.]

41070.

If the department is not satisfied with return or returns of the surcharges or the amount of surcharges required to be paid upon the basis of the facts contained in the return or returns or upon the basis of any information within its possession or that may come into its possession, one or more deficiency determinations may be made of the
 amounts payable for one or for more than one period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 25.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41071.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the day specified pursuant to Section 41051 for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 591, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

41072.

In making a determination the department may offset overpayments for another period or periods, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 79.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41073.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 80.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41074.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 81.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41075.

The department shall give to the service supplier, seller, or service user written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope with postage paid addressed to the service supplier, seller, or service user at the service supplier’s, seller’s, or service user’s address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States
 Post Office or facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of such delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The feepayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the feepayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed complete at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the feepayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 71.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41076.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, or failure to make a return, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be served within three years after the last day of the second calendar month following the reporting period for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires the later. In the case of failure to make a return, every notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the last day of the second calendar month following the reporting period for which the amount is proposed to be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 72.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41077.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the surcharge or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 73.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41078.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 41076 for serving a notice of deficiency determination, the taxpayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after that time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 74.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Determinations if No Return Made [41080. - 41084.]

41080.

If any person fails to make a return, the department shall make an estimate of the number of access lines or purchases of prepaid mobile telephony services that are subject to the surcharges. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information which is in the department’s possession or may come into its possession. Upon the basis of this estimate the department shall compute and determine the
 amounts
 required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 26.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41081.

In making a determination the department may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 85.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41082.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the day specified pursuant to Section 41051 for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 591, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

41083.

If the failure of any person to file a return is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the penalty provided in Section 41080.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 86.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41084.

Promptly after making its determination the department shall give to the person written notice of the estimate, determination, and penalty, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 75.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [41085. - 41091.]

41085.

Any person against whom a determination is made under Article 3 or 4 of this chapter may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after service upon the person of notice thereof. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41086.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the department issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 88.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41087.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the department shall reconsider the determination and, if the person has so requested in the person’s petition, shall grant the person an oral hearing and shall give the person 10 days’ written notice of the time and place of the hearing. The department may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 89.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41088.

The department may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the department at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 41074 or Section 41080 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase shall be asserted within eight years after the last day of the second calendar month following the month for which the increase is asserted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 90.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41089.

The order or decision of the department upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 91.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41090.

All determinations made by the department under Article 3 or 4 of this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 92.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41091.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 76.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest and Penalties [41095. - 41099.]

41095.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any surcharge to the state or any amount of surcharge required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the department under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 41080), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the surcharge in addition to the surcharge or amount of surcharge, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the surcharge or the amount of surcharge required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section
 41052 or the due date established by the department in accordance with Section 41052.1, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the surcharge with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the surcharge for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 58.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41095.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the surcharges were due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of the
 surcharges was made one business day after the date the surcharges were due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of the surcharges.

(3) The person files a request for a one-day adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of
 Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(d) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(e) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, or a determination where no return has been filed.

(f) This section shall only apply to electronic payments of surcharges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 27.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41096.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 41060, 41080, 41090, and 41095.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the penalty for any person
 in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 59.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41097.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 41054, 41060, 41082, and 41095.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation
 made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 60.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41097.5.

(a) The department, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part if the failure to pay the surcharge is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the
 department acting in the employee’s official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other
 information which the department may require.

(d) The department may grant relief only for interest imposed on surcharge liabilities that arise during surcharge periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 97.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41098.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the department, the person may be relieved of the surcharges imposed by this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the department, only if the department finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the department advise the person whether a
 particular activity or transaction is subject to the surcharge under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The department responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to the surcharges, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to the surcharges.

(3) The liability for surcharges applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the department rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of rescinded or modified
 advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the department’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the department’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the department all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the department and a copy of the department’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the department may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the department’s written advice to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 28.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41099.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the department, if:
